Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.490

Application for and effective date of retirement allowances.

Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.430, 41.26.470, or 41.26.510 shall be eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with the department.

(1) Retirement allowances paid to members under the provisions of RCW 41.26.430 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from service.

(2) Retirement allowances paid to vested members no longer in service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.26.430, shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such qualification.

(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members under the provisions of RCW 41.26.470 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from service for disability.

(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits under the provisions of RCW 41.26.510 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

(5) A person is separated from service on the date a person has terminated all employment with an employer.

[ 1997 c 254 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—1997 c 254: "(1) This act, which defines separation from service and restrictions concerning postretirement employment, is intended to clarify existing statutory provisions regarding these issues. As a result of this act, the legal standard for determining separation from service and the impact to a retiree's benefit should they return to work following retirement, are either the same as under the prior law, or less restrictive. Accordingly, this act does not constitute a diminution of benefits and applies to all members of the affected retirement systems.

(2) This act, which addresses the determination of employee status, is intended to clarify existing law. The clarifications are consistent with long-standing common law of the state of Washington and long-standing department of retirement systems' interpretations of the appropriate standard to be used in determining employee status. Accordingly, sections 3(49) and 10(22) of this act do not constitute a diminution of benefits and apply to all members of the teachers' retirement system and the public employees' retirement system." [ 1997 c 254 s 1.]

Application—1997 c 254: "This act applies to all overpayments discovered by the department of retirement systems on or after June 1, 1996, except that sections 10, 12, 14, 15, and 16 of this act apply retroactively to any person who retired under chapter 234, Laws of 1992 or part III of chapter 519, Laws of 1993." [ 1997 c 254 s 17.]

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.